Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-531
Enlarged district; eminent domain; borrowing money; bonds; interest; issuance; election.

Such enlarged district shall have the power of eminent domain under the same conditions as the original sanitary drainage district. Such enlarged district may borrow money for corporate purposes and issue bonds therefor, but it shall not become indebted in any manner to an amount exceeding one and four-tenths percent of the taxable valuation of the property in the district for county purposes. Before incurring any indebtedness, the question shall be submitted to the certified voters of the district in the manner provided by law for submitting the question of bond issue by the county for internal improvements.

Laws 1919, c. 240, § 8, p. 1002;

C.S.1922, § 1887;

C.S.1929, § 31-625;

R.S.1943, § 31-531;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 94, p. 332;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 137;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 124;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 25.

Issuance of bonds by county for internal improvements, see section 10-401 et seq.